Washington statutes.
RCW 19.240.100

Gift certificates issued by financial institutions—Application of chapter.

This chapter does not apply to gift certificates issued by financial institutions as defined in *RCW 30.22.041 or their operating subsidiaries that are usable with multiple unaffiliated sellers of goods or services.

[ 2004 c 168 s 11.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30.22.041 was recodified as RCW 30A.22.041 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.